Massachusetts, session 194th, H1195.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 7A of Chapter 90 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting at the end thereof the following:-
A penalty imposed for a violation of this section shall not be considered a moving
violation for the purpose of determining insurance surcharges on motor vehicle premiums
pursuant to Section 113B of Chapter 175.
SECTION 2. Section 7V of said chapter 90, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
inserting at the end thereof the following:-
of 2

A penalty imposed for a violation of this section shall not be considered a moving
violation for the purpose of determining insurance surcharges on motor vehicle premiums
pursuant to Section 113B of Chapter 175.
of 2